Idaho, session 2025, H0364.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 23, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-2362, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-2362. DEPARTMENT OF GOVERNMENT EFFICIENCY LEGISLATIVE TASK
FORCE. (1) The state of Idaho recognizes the importance of efficient and
responsible governance to best serve the interests of Idaho's citizens.
Government inefficiencies, redundancies, and regulatory burdens contribute
to unnecessary costs and operational delays and hinder economic growth and
effective public service. Proper oversight of state agencies and public
expenditures is necessary to ensure fiscal responsibility, prevent waste,
and enhance accountability. Therefore, a dedicated legislative task force
is necessary to review agency functions, regulatory processes, and budget
authority to uphold Idaho's commitment to effective governance.
(2) No later than July 1, 2025, the legislature shall form a department
of government efficiency (DOGE) legislative task force that shall consist of
nine (9) members as follows:
(a) Three (3) members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives;
(b) Three (3) members of the senate appointed by the president pro tem-
pore of the senate; and
(c) Three (3) legislative members from the joint finance-appropria-
tions committee to be appointed by the cochairs of the joint finance-ap-
propriations committee. Of these members, one (1) shall be a member of
the house of representatives, one (1) shall be a member of the senate,
and the third shall be a member of either the house of representatives or
the senate.
(3) Initial DOGE task force members shall be appointed by July 1, 2025,
and shall serve until November 30, 2026. Thereafter, DOGE task force mem-
bers shall serve one (1) year terms. After the initial term, DOGE task force
members shall be appointed annually on or before November 30 each year. Task
force members may be reappointed. The task force shall retain the membership
composition described in subsection (2) of this section for the duration of
its existence.
(4) One (1) member appointed by the speaker of the house of representa-
tives shall serve as a cochair of the DOGE task force, and one (1) member ap-


pointed by the president pro tempore of the senate shall serve as the other
cochair.
(5) The task force shall meet at least twice a year and may be called
for special meetings by the cochairs of the task force. Five (5) members
shall constitute a quorum. Members of the task force shall be compensated as
provided by the citizens' committee on legislative compensation in the same
manner as interim legislative meetings, which compensation shall be paid
from the legislative account.
(6) The DOGE task force may appoint up to two (2) nonlegislative advi-
sors with technical expertise to assist the committee in efficiently con-
ducting and completing its business. Nonlegislative advisors shall not be
reimbursed from legislative funds for per diem, mileage, or other expenses,
and shall not have voting privileges regarding the DOGE task force's recom-
mendations or proposed legislation.
(7) The DOGE task force is authorized to study and review governmental
efficiency matters pertaining to the state of Idaho in general in order to
determine, as applicable, how the legislature may be able to ensure fiscal
responsibility, prevent waste, and enhance accountability.
(8) The DOGE task force may divide its work into three (3) subgroups to
focus on specific areas of government efficiency:
(a) A regulatory accountability subgroup, which shall focus on evalu-
ating ways to strengthen oversight of state agency rulemaking and mak-
ing recommendations to ensure Idaho's leadership in regulatory reduc-
tion, with a goal of eliminating or shifting nearly all regulations to
statute by 2033;
(b) A budget accountability subgroup, which shall focus on conducting
base budget reviews, identifying opportunities to eliminate wasteful
or redundant government services, programs, and expenditures, and mak-
ing recommendations to further strengthen budget processes; and
(c) A government operations and oversight subgroup, which shall focus
on assessing the structure of state government and recommending agency
consolidations or streamlining efforts to optimize efficiency and en-
sure services are administered by the most appropriate agencies.
(9) The DOGE task force shall from time to time advise the legislature
of its findings and recommendations. A copy of any reports, findings, or
proposed legislation shall be submitted to the legislative services office
electronically. Any subgroup of the DOGE task force shall report any re-
ports, findings, or proposed legislation to the DOGE task force as a whole.
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
task force, acting through the cochairs, may utilize staff and resources
within state government. The task force shall make use of technology
resources, including artificial intelligence, whenever doing so would in-
crease the DOGE task force's efficiency.
(11) The task force shall operate until November 30, 2029. Thereafter,
the DOGE task force shall be dissolved and the provisions of this section
shall become null, void, and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. The provisions of Section 1 of this act shall be null, void
and of no force and effect on and after December 1, 2029.


SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.